Utah statutes.
76-10-3116.   Venue of actions by state -- Transfer.

Any action brought by the state pursuant to this act shall be brought in any county wherein the defendant resides or does business, or at the option of the defendant, such action shall be transferred, upon motion made within 30 days after commencement of the action, to Salt Lake County.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

